Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-2409
Rules and regulations.

The Department of Health and Human Services shall, upon the recommendation of the Board of Pharmacy, adopt and promulgate rules and regulations necessary to carry out the Mail Service Pharmacy Licensure Act.

Laws 1988, LB 350, § 4;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 624;

Laws 1999, LB 828, § 165;

Laws 2003, LB 667, § 10;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 539.

Minimum standards for rules and regulations, see section 38-2899.